Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 35. Domestic Violence.

Secs. 25.35.010 — 25.35.050.
Injunctive relief in cases involving domestic violence. [Repealed, § 72 ch 64 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 18.66.100 — 18.66.180.]

Sec. 25.35.060.

[Renumbered as AS 25.35.200.]

Secs. 25.35.100 — 25.35.150.
[Renumbered as AS 18.66.200 — 18.66.250.]

Sec. 25.35.200.
Definition. [Repealed, § 72 ch 64 SLA 1996.]